Utah statutes.
76-10-710.   Presumption of director's concurrence in action if present at
meeting -- Written dissent required.
Every director of a corporation or joint stock association who is present at a
meeting of the directors at which any act, proceeding, or omission of the
directors in violation of this part occurs is deemed to have concurred
therein, unless he at the time causes, or in writing requires, his dissent
therefrom to be entered in the minutes of the directors or forwards his
dissent by registered mail to the secretary of the corporation immediately
after the adjournment of the meeting.
